Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Penalties

49.990.
Penalty for failure or refusal to obey subpoena or order of Board of Tax Appeals, Crime Victims Compensation Board, or Board of Claims.

Any person who fails or refuses to obey a subpoena or order of the Board of Tax Appeals, the Crime Victims Compensation Board, or the Board of Claims made pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History.

Enact. Acts 2017, ch. 74 § 50, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 56, effective June 29, 2021.